Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB508.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Wildlife Rehabilitation Grant Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The Pennsylvania Game Commission."Facilities." Equipment or housing used in, or necessary for, wildlife rehabilitation."Fund." The Wildlife Rehabilitation Grant Fund established under section 5(a)."Program." The Wildlife Rehabilitation Grant Program 123456789101112131415161718 established under section 3(a)."Wildlife." As defined in 34 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Wildlife rehabilitation." As follows:(1) The recovery, treatment, restoration or temporary care of injured, sick, diseased, orphaned or displaced wildlife.(2) The term includes the subsequent release of healthy wildlife to appropriate habitats in the wild."Wildlife rehabilitator." A nonprofit organization permitted as a wildlife rehabilitator in accordance with 58 Pa. Code Ch. 147 Subch. P (relating to wildlife rehabilitation).Section 3. Wildlife Rehabilitation Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Wildlife Rehabilitation Grant Program is established and shall be administered by the commission.(b) Purpose.--The purpose of the program is to award grants to wildlife rehabilitators in accordance with this act.(c) Eligible uses of grants.--Grants awarded under the program must be used for the following purposes:(1) Wildlife rehabilitation.(2) The improvement of facilities for wildlife rehabilitation.(3) A purpose related to any of the purposes described under paragraph (1) or (2), as determined by the commission.Section 4. Grant process.(a) Application.--To be eligible for a grant under the program, a wildlife rehabilitator must submit a written grant application to the commission in a manner and on a form prescribed by the commission. The application must include the 20250HB0508PN0490 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following information:(1) The name, address and contact information of the wildlife rehabilitator.(2) The purpose or purposes for which the grant is sought.(3) The amount of the grant requested.(4) The wildlife intake of the wildlife rehabilitator from the previous fiscal year.(5) Any other information or documentation required by the commission.(b) Review and determination.--(1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3), within 60 days after receipt of a completed application under the program, the commission shall review the application and determine whether to approve or deny the application, in whole or in part.(2) If the commission fails to make a determination in accordance with paragraph (1), the application shall be deemed denied.(3) To aid in the determination of whether to award a grant under the program, the commission may require additional information or verification following receipt of a completed application. The time period specified under paragraph (1) shall commence upon receipt of the additional information or verification.(c) Wildlife intake.--The commission shall determine the amount of each grant under the program based on the wildlife intake of the wildlife rehabilitator from the previous fiscal year, which is set as follows:(1) For wildlife intake numbers of 1 to 100, $2,500.20250HB0508PN0490 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) For wildlife intake numbers of 101 to 250, $5,000.(3) For wildlife intake numbers of 251 to 500, $7,500.(4) For wildlife intake numbers of 501 to 750, $10,000.(5) For wildlife intake numbers of 751 to 1,000, $15,000.(6) For wildlife intake numbers of 1,001 to 1,500, $20,000.(7) For wildlife intake numbers of 1,501 to 2,000, $35,000.(8) For wildlife intake numbers of 2,001 to 2,500, $50,000.(9) For wildlife intake numbers of more than 2,500, $75,000.(d) Other limitations.--(1) Grants under the program shall be disbursed on a first-come, first-served basis determined by the commission and until all money in the fund is exhausted.(2) The commission may award only one grant during a calendar year for each office location of a wildlife rehabilitator.(e) Notice.--After making a determination regarding the approval or denial, in whole or in part, of an application under the program, the commission shall provide written notice of the determination to the applicant in accordance with the following:(1) If the commission approves the application, the notice must include the amount of the grant awarded and any conditions or restrictions on the use of the grant.(2) If the commission denies the application, in whole or in part, the notice must include the reasons for the denial.20250HB0508PN0490 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Report by wildlife rehabilitator.--No later than the May 1 after a wildlife rehabilitator receives a grant under this act, the wildlife rehabilitator shall provide to the commission information on the use of the grant, including the wildlife intake and wildlife rehabilitation efforts made possible as a result of the grant, on a form and in a manner determined by the commission.Section 5. Wildlife Rehabilitation Grant Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Wildlife Rehabilitation Grant Fund is established as a nonlapsing fund in the State Treasury. Any money remaining in the fund, including interest, at the end of each fiscal year shall revert to the Game Fund.(b) Fund sources.--(1) The General Assembly may appropriate money to carry out the provisions of this act.(2) The commission may solicit and accept alternative funding for the program, including Federal money, grants, donations, gifts and other payments from any source.(3) Money for the program shall be deposited into the fund.(c) Appropriation.--All money deposited into the fund and interest earned on the money in the fund are appropriated to the commission on a continuing basis to award grants under the program.Section 6. Reports.(a) Submittal.--No later than the June 1 that is at least one year after the effective date of this subsection and each June 1 thereafter, the commission shall submit a report on the program to the following:(1) The Governor.20250HB0508PN0490 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The executive director of the commission.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Game and Fisheries Committee of the Senate.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Game and Fisheries Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Contents.--Each annual report under this section shall include the following:(1) The number of applications received under the program.(2) The number of grants awarded under the program.(3) The total dollar amount of grants awarded under the program.(4) The amount of each grant awarded under the program.(5) The number of grants denied under the program, in whole or in part, along with the reasons for the denial.(6) The amount remaining in the fund.(7) The use of each grant awarded, including each wildlife rehabilitator's wildlife intake and wildlife rehabilitation efforts made possible as a result of the grant.(8) Any recommendations by the commission to improve the program.(c) Posting.--Each annual report under this section shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the commission.Section 7. Policies and procedures.20250HB0508PN0490 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The commission shall implement any necessary policy or procedure to administer the program and fund.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0508PN0490 - 7 - 1234